src/phonology/mrj-phon.twolc
!! !!!Hill Mari twol file

!! !!Alphabet, Sets and Definitions

Alphabet

!! !!Letters of the alphabet

а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ҥ о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӓ ӹ !!= * @CODE@
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ҥ О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӓ Ӹ !!= * @CODE@

!! !!Archiphonemes for vowels
!  е1:е а1:а и1:и у1:у ӱ1:ӱ
!  Е1:Е %{аӓ%}:А И1:И У1:У Ӱ1:Ӱ
! JMR 2012-09-18
! %{аӓ%}:а 
 %{аӓ%}:ӓ  !!= * @CODE@ a/ä alternation in vowel harmony

 Е3:е !!= * @CODE@ ӓвӓмвлӓ 
! Е2:е != * @CODE@ 
 Е2:0 !!= * @CODE@
 %{ыӹØ%}:0 !!= * @CODE@ 

 %{ыӹе%}:0 !! * @CODE@ used in verb affix onset
 %{ыӹэ%}:0 !! * @CODE@ used in noun affix onset ine, ill
 %{аӓе%}:0 !! * @CODE@ used in verb affix onset
! %{ыӹ%}:ы
! %{ыӹ%}:ӹ
 %{ыӹ%}:0  !!= * @CODE@ 
 А2:а !!= * @CODE@ 
! А2:я

 Ь2:0 !!= * @CODE@  except with V АМ +Prt1+Sg1-3

!! !!Triggers
 %{front%}:0 %{back%}:0 !!= * @CODE@ front-back vowel harmony
%^ConsTransf:0 !!= * @CODE@ 
%^KIN:0        !!= * @CODE@  with ӓвӓ in +PxSg1+Sg+Gen etc.
%^А2ЫӸ:0       !!= * @CODE@  with карта and картын витринӹн

!! !!Boundary symbols

 %> !!= * @CODE@ 
 #  !!  * hash #
 %- !!= * @CODE@ 


 ;


!! !!Sets 

Sets
BackLabVow =   о у ё ю О У Ё Ю ;
FrontLabVow =   ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ;
NonLabVow =   ӓ а е и э я Ӓ А Е И Э Я ;
Vow =  BackLabVow FrontLabVow NonLabVow ы Ы  ӹ Ӹ ; 
BackVow = BackLabVow а А ы Ы ;
FrontVow = FrontLabVow е и э ӓ ӹ Е И Э Ӓ Ӹ ;
ArchiVow = %{ыӹØ%} %{ыӹ%} %{аӓ%} ;
FullVow = BackLabVow FrontLabVow NonLabVow ;

CnsNoLN =  б в г д ж з к м ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
           Б В Г Д Ж З К М Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;


Cns =  б в г д ж з к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
       Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;
Cst =  к п т ф х ц ч ш с 
       К П Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ц ;

Ltrs = Vow Cns Й й  ъ ь Ъ Ь ;

all =  Ltrs  %- ;

HarmDummies = %{back%} %{front%} ;


!! !!Definitions

Definitions

! Back Harmony
BHARM = [ %{back%}: \[ # | %{front%}: ]* ] ;

! Front Harmony
FHARM = [ %{front%}: \[ # | %{back%}: ]* ] ;



LFC =  [ :FrontVow | Е2:е | Е2:э | :е | :ӹ | :Ӹ ] \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]* (%{аӓ%}:я ) \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]*  (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ;
! # [ Cns | й ]*  [ :FrontVow | Е2: | :е | :ӹ | :Ӹ ] \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]* (%{аӓ%}:я ) \[ #: | :BackVow | :ы | :Ы ]*  (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ;

LBC = # [ Cns | й ]* [ :BackVow ] \[ #: | :FrontVow | :Ӹ | :ӹ ]* (%{аӓ%}:я) \[ #: | :FrontVow | :Ӹ | :ӹ ]* (%^А2ЫӸ:0) ;
! [ :BackVow ] ( %> | %^ConsTransf:0 | %^KIN:0 | BackVow | %{аӓ%}:а | %{аӓ%}:я | %{ыӹØ%}:ы | Ь2:0 | %{ыӹØ%}:0 | Е3:0 | %{ыӹ%}:ы | Cns: )* ;


!! !!Rules

Rules

!! !!Palatalisation

"Palatal mark loss before vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
    ь:0  <=>   _ (HarmDummies:) %> А2: ;
         [ н | л ] _ (HarmDummies:) %> [ :я | :е | :и | :ю ]  ;
    
"й Deletion in front of я Suffix and others"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  й:0 <=> _ (HarmDummies:) [( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | :я | :е | :и | :ю ] | [ ы:0 | ӹ:0 ] ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{аӓ%}: | %{ыӹе%}:| е ] ]  ;
    _ (HarmDummies:) %> %{аӓ%}: ;
!!€# кай%>%{аӓ%}ш
!!€0 ка00яш
         
  
"Ь2:ь Palatal mark for V АМ +Prt1+Sg1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Ь2:ь <=> [ н | л ] (HarmDummies:) _ %> %{ыӹØ%}: ;
!! толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1
!!€ тол%{back%}Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}м
!!€ тол0ь%>ым

"Ь2:0 Palatal mark for V АМ +Prt1+Sg1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Ь2:0 <=> [ FullVow | й | CnsNoLN: ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: | [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ] ;
         Cns (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ;

"Ь2:ш Palatal mark for V ЕМ +Prt1+Sg1"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Ь2:ш <=> [ ӹ | ы ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) _ %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: | [н | д] %{аӓ%}: ] ;



!! !!Vowel rules
"Onset vowel in а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аӓе%}:а <=>  [Cns - [й:] |BackVow - [ы:]] %{back%}: %>  _ ;


"Onset vowel in ӓ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аӓе%}:ӓ <=>  [Cns - [й:] |FrontVow - [ӹ:]] %{front%}: %>  _ ;

"Onset vowel in я"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аӓе%}:я <=> й: (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ;

"Onset vowel in е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аӓе%}:е <=> [ ы: | ӹ: ] (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ;

!"Onset vowel in э"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{аӓе%}:э <=> [Vow - [ ы: | ӹ: ]] (HarmDummies:) %>  _ ;


! JMR 2012-09-18
"Onset vowel loss in suffix ыӹ0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
   %{ыӹØ%}:0 <=> :Vow (HarmDummies:) ( %^KIN:0 ) %> _ ;
   	   _ %> [ е | %{ыӹе%}: | %{ыӹØ%}:ы | %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ ] ;
           %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  ;
          [[ а:ӹ | а:ы ] %^А2ЫӸ:0| и ] %> _ ;
          


"Onset vowel loss in suffix Е3"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
   Е3:0 <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %^KIN:0 %> _ ;
           %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  ;


 "Onset vowel loss in suffix Е2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
   Е2:0 <=> %> ж %{ыӹ%}: %> _  Cns ;


"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix :е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
  Е2:е <=> [[ Cns - ж: ] (%{ыӹ%}: |ӹ:|ы:|к:)| й: |[Cns | Vow] ж ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> _ [в|м|н|т|ш|п] ;

"Onset vowel Е2:э after retained vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Е2:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> _ [в|м|н|т|ш|п] ;

"Onset vowel Е3:э after retained vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Е3:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;

"Onset vowel е:э after retained vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__
е:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;
!!= @CODE@ The three onset vowels need checking 2014-01-10

"Stem final ы loss before Е2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
ы:0 <=> #: Cns* Vow Cns+ _ (HarmDummies:) %>  Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] ;
           _ (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf:) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{ыӹе%}: | е | %{аӓ%}: [м|т|ш|%>|#] | Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | Е3: ] ;
        [ и | у | а | ы ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;
!!€ карта%>ы%>ын
!!€ карт0%>ы%>0н

"Stem final ӹ loss before Е2"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
ӹ:0 <=> #: Cns* Vow Cns+ _ (HarmDummies:) %> Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] ;
           _ (HarmDummies:) (%^ConsTransf: ) %> [ %{аӓе%}: | %{ыӹе%}: | е | %{аӓ%}: [м|т|ш|%>|#]| Е2: [в|м|н|т|ш] | Е3: ] ;
        [ и | ӱ | ӓ | ӹ ] (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;
!!€ бирка%{front%}%>ӹ%>ӹн
!!€ бирк00%>ӹ%>0н

!! !!Vowel harmony

"Onset vowel ыӹ0 realized in suffix  %{ыӹØ%}:ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
  %{ыӹØ%}:ы <=>
  [BHARM  Cns  | Cns %{back%}: (Ь2:) %> ]  _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ;
!  [ BHARM  Cns   (HarmDummies:) (( (ы) Ь2:) %> )| BHARM ( н | л ) (HarmDummies:) (ы) Ь2: %> | BackVow й: (HarmDummies:)( (ы) Ь2:0 ) %> | :BackVow Cns* (HarmDummies:) | [ :BackVow | BHARM ] [ Cns+ | Cns* й ] [ %{ыӹØ%}:0 | ы:0 ] %> ] _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ;
                 
! [[ Cns | й ]+ %> | %> [ %> | BackVow | е | ArchiVow: | Cns ]* [ Cns | й ] ( %> ) ] _ [ ( %> ) Cns | # ] ;

"Onset vowel %{ыӹØ%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
  %{ыӹØ%}:ӹ <=>
[FHARM  Cns  | Cns %{front%}: (Ь2:) %> ]  _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns ] | # ] ;
![ FHARM [ Cns  | й ]  ( (ӹ) Ь2: ) | :FrontVow Cns+ | [ :FrontVow | FHARM ] [ Cns+ | Cns* й ] [ %{ыӹØ%}:0 | ӹ:0 ] ( (ӹ) Ь2:) ] (%{front%}:) %> _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns  ] | # ] ;
      FHARM  н _ т ;
![ :FrontVow :0* ]  н _ т ;
!                 :FrontVow  н _ т ;
                  FHARM [ ш | м ] (%{front%}:) _ [ ( %> ) [ Cns  ] | # ] ;

"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:ӹ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ыӹе%}:ӹ <=> [FHARM [ Cns | й ] | [ Cns | й ] %{front%}: ] %> _  ;
! FHARM [ Cns | й ] (%{front%}:) %> _  ;

"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ыӹе%}:ы <=> [BHARM [ Cns | й ]|[ Cns | й ] %{back%}: ] %> _  ;
!BHARM [ Cns | й ] (%{back%}:) %> _  ;

"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ыӹе%}:е <=> [ Cns: | й: ] [ ы:0 | ӹ:0 | %{ыӹØ%}: ] (HarmDummies:) %> _  ;
! [ ы: | ӹ: | %{ыӹØ%}: ]  %> _  ;
        
"Onset vowel %{ыӹе%} realized in suffix  %{ыӹе%}:э"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ыӹе%}:э <=>  Vow (HarmDummies:)  %> _  ;
!  Vow   %> _  ;

"Onset vowel %{ыӹэ%} realized in Ine and Ill suffixes %{ыӹэ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ыӹэ%}:0 <=> [ ы | ӹ ] %> _  ;
!!€# комбы%>%{ыӹэ%}штем
!!€0 комбы00штем

"Onset vowel %{ыӹэ%} realized in Ine and Ill suffixes %{ыӹэ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ыӹэ%}:э <=> [ а | ӓ | я | о ] %> _  ;
!!€# олма%>%{ыӹэ%}штем
!!€0 олма0эштем


!%{аӓ%}:я <=> Vow й:0 (ы:0|ӹ:0) %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ;
"Affix mid or final front %{аӓ%}:ӓ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аӓ%}:ӓ <=> [ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ] %{front%}:  [(%^ConsTransf:) Ь2: %> Cns*| %> ]   _ ;

![ FHARM (ӹ:) [ :Cns (%>)| %> Cns:+ ] | :FrontVow Cns* %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м ) | %> [ Е2:е | %{ыӹе%}:е | %{ыӹе%}:э | %{ыӹе%}:ӹ | %{ыӹе%}: м %{аӓ%}:ӓ ] [в|д|м|н|т|ш] Cns:* | Cns ӹ: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#] ;
!      [е [в|д|м|н|т|ш]|ӓ] %> Cns* _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#] ;
!!€# комбы%>еш%>н%{аӓ%}
!!€0 комб00еш0нӓ
!          :FrontVow Cns* %> р _ к ;
!          FrontVow  ӹ: %> _ # ;
          FHARM [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] | :FrontVow | :FrontLabVow]+ %> Cns* _ ;
!          [ :FrontVow | :FrontLabVow ] [ :0 - й:0 ]* %> Cns* _ ;
! [ FHARM (ӹ:) [ :Cns (%>)| %> Cns:+ ] | :FrontVow Cns* %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м ) | %> [ Е2:е | %{ыӹе%}:е | %{ыӹе%}:ӹ | %{ыӹе%}: м %{аӓ%}:ӓ ] [в|д|м|н|т|ш] Cns:* | Cns ӹ: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|%>|#] ;
!!€# библиотека%{front%}%^А2ЫӸ%>л%{аӓ%}н
!!€0 библиотекӹ00%>лӓн

"Affix mid or final back %{аӓ%}:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{аӓ%}:а <=>
   [ Cns: - [й:|ь:] ] %{back%}: [(%^ConsTransf:) Ь2: %> Cns*| %> ]  _ ;
 :BackVow  Cns*  _ ;
!! толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: __come/tulla__
!!€ тол%{back%}%>%{ыӹе%}н%{аӓ%}
!!€ тол0%>ына
 
![ :BackVow  Cns*  %> ( %{ыӹØ%}: м | %{ыӹе%}:ы м ( %{аӓ%}:а д ) | %{ыӹе%}:ы [н|д] ) | :BackVow й %> [ %{ыӹØ%}: м | %{ыӹе%}:ы м ( %{аӓ%}:а д ) | %{ыӹе%}:ы [н|д] ] | BHARM [ й %> %{ыӹØ%}: м  | :Cns  %> |р|н|д|л]| Cns ы: %> ] _ [д|м|н|т|ш|к|%>|#];
          BHARM [ Cns:0 - [й:0|ь:0] |:BackVow | :BackLabVow ]+ %> Cns* _ ;
!          [ :BackVow | :BackLabVow ] [ :0 - й:0 ]* %> Cns* _ ;
!          BackVow  й: %^ConsTransf:0 %> [ н | д ] _ [м|т|%>|#];
!!€# колт%>%{ыӹØ%}д%{аӓ%}
!!€0 колт0ыда
!  # я Cns:+ %> _ ;
!!€# яд%{back%}%>%{аӓ%}ш
!!€0 яд0%>аш

"Affix mid or final back %{аӓ%}:я"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{аӓ%}:я <=> Vow й: (ы:0|ӹ:0) (HarmDummies:)  %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ;
!!€# кай%>%{аӓ%}ш
!!€0 ка0%>яш
          Cns ь:0 (HarmDummies:) %> _ [м|т|ш|%>|#] ;

"Affix initial back а:я"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 а:я <=> й:0 (HarmDummies:) %> _ \[ %^А2ЫӸ: ] ;

"Not SgNom а:ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__
а:ы <=>
         Cns+ _ %{back%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ;
!BackVow Cns+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ;

"Not SgNom а:ӹ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
а:ӹ <=>
           Cns+ _ %{front%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ;
!FrontVow Cns+ _ %^А2ЫӸ:0 %> \[ е ] ;


"suffix-final vowel backed %{ыӹ%}ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{ыӹ%}:ы <=> BHARM Cns _ [ м %{ыӹØ%}: | %>  (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns: | # ] ;
          [BHARM (й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ))| а:ы %{back%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0 ] %> [ (0:ы) ж | ш т | %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] ] _ [ %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns:  | # ] ;

!  BHARM %> [ ж: | д %{ыӹ%}: м | ( %{ыӹØ%}: ) м | ( %{ыӹØ%}: ) ш ] _ [ #: | %> [ л | г | ш [ т | к ] | д | %{ыӹØ%}: [ м | н ] ]] ;
!          BHARM %> д _ м %{ыӹ%}: ;
! Work 2012-10-29            %>  %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> %{ыӹØ%}: ;


"suffix-final vowel fronted %{ыӹ%}:ӹ"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{ыӹ%}:ӹ <=> FHARM Cns _ [ м %{ыӹØ%}: | %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns: | # ] ;
          [FHARM (й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ))| а:ӹ %{front%}: %^А2ЫӸ:0  ] %> [ (0:ӹ ) ж | ш т | %{ыӹØ%}: ш [ т | к ] ] _ [ %> (%{ыӹØ%}:) Cns:  | # ] ;
! FHARM Cns _ [ %> :0* Cns: | # ] ;
!          FHARM й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ ж | ш т ] _ [ %>  :0* Cns:  | # ] ;

!! !!Consonant loss or transformation

"т:0 in am type verbs" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ лӓктӓш:лӓкнӓ
т:0 <=> к _ %^ConsTransf:0 ;

"к:0 in am type verbs" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ качкаш:качна
к:0 <=> [ ш | ч ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ; 

"з:ц in am type verbs" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ вазаш:вацна
з:ц <=> [ Vow | н: ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ;

"н:0 before з:ц in am type verbs" 
!! __@RULENAME@__ негӹнзӓш:негӹц
н:0 <=>  _ з: %^ConsTransf:0 ;

!! !!Vowel again

!! !Vowel gain
"0:ы between ш _ ж"
!! __@RULENAME@__ йиш:йишӹжӹ
0:ы <=> [ BHARM ш | ш %{back%}: ] %> _ ж %{ыӹ%}: ;

"0:ӹ between ш _ ж"
!! __@RULENAME@__ йиш:йишӹжӹ
0:ӹ <=> [ FHARM ш | ш %{front%}: ] %> _ ж %{ыӹ%}: ;
